District of Columbia statutes.
16-914.01

Retention of jurisdiction as to alimony, custody of children, and child support.

After the issuance of a judgment, decree, or order granting custody, child support, or alimony, the Court retains jurisdiction for the entry of future orders modifying or terminating the initial judgment, decree, or order to the extent the retention of jurisdiction does not contravene other statutory provisions.

History

Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-207, § 2(j), 49 DCR 7827

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-831.03.